Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2513.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "school entity" in section 1753.2-E(n) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended to read:Section 1753.2-E. Commonwealth Financing Authority.* * *(n) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"School entity." A school district, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2513PN3400 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617